Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-942.01
Registration and voting after voter registration deadline; certain naturalized citizens; procedure.

If a person becomes a naturalized citizen of the United States after the voter registration deadline for any election, such person may register to vote after the voter registration deadline by completing the necessary voter registration application in the office of the election commissioner or county clerk of the county of such person's residence before one hour prior to the closing of the polls on election day. After completing the voter registration application and the citizenship attestation provided by section 32-928, such person shall then be allowed to vote in the office of the election commissioner or county clerk.

Laws 2024, LB287, § 46.